Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.235

Purchase of wireless devices or services.

(1) State agencies that are purchasing wireless devices or services must make such purchases through the state master contract, unless the state agency provides to Washington technology solutions evidence that the state agency is securing its wireless devices or services from another source for a lower cost than through participation in the state master contract.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "state agency" means any office, department, board, commission, or other unit of state government, but does not include a unit of state government headed by a statewide elected official, an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the student achievement council, the state board for community and technical colleges, or agencies of the legislative or judicial branches of state government.

[ 2024 c 54 s 30; 2012 c 229 s 584; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 734; 2010 c 282 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.19.797, 43.105.410.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.